Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.4, as


last amended by Section 138, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 427.4), is amended to read as follows:


Section 427.4. A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority


shall employ an Executive Director and other personnel as necessary


to assist the Authority in carrying out its duties. The Executive


Director shall be appointed hired by the Governor, with the advice


and consent of the Senate. The Executive Director shall serve at


the pleasure of the Governor and may be removed or replaced without


cause Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority Executive Advisory

Req. No. 2629 Page 1


Council. The Executive Director shall report to the Council and may


be removed or replaced with cause. Compensation for the Executive


Director shall be determined pursuant to Section 3601.2 of Title 74


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The Authority shall not employ an individual if any of the


following circumstances exist:


1. The individual has a direct or indirect interest in a


licensed medical marijuana business; or


2. The individual or his or her spouse, parent, child, spouse


of a child, sibling, or spouse of a sibling has an application for a


medical marijuana business license pending before the Authority or


is a member of the board of directors of a medical marijuana


business, or is an individual financially interested in any licensee


or medical marijuana business.


C. All officers and employees of the Authority shall be in the


exempt unclassified service.


D. The Executive Director may delegate to any officer or


employee of the Authority any of the powers of the Executive


Director and may designate any officer or employee of the Authority


to perform any of the duties of the Executive Director.


E. The Executive Director may promulgate rules governing the


oversight and implementation of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and


Patient Protection Act.



Req. No. 2629 Page 2


F. The Authority is hereby authorized to create employment


positions necessary for the implementation of its obligations


pursuant to the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection


Act including, but not limited to, investigators of the Authority


and a director of enforcement. The Authority, the director of


enforcement, the Executive Director, investigators of the Authority,


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control,


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, and the Attorney General


shall have all the powers and authority of a peace officer of this


state for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of the Oklahoma


Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act and other laws


pertaining to medical marijuana, rules promulgated by the Executive


Director, or criminal laws of this state. These powers shall


include, but not be limited to:


1. Investigating violations or suspected violations of the


Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act or other laws


pertaining to medical marijuana, any rules promulgated pursuant


thereto, and any violations of criminal laws of this state


discovered through the course of such investigations;


2. Serving and executing all warrants, summonses, subpoenas,


administrative citations, notices or other processes relating to the


enforcement of laws regulating marijuana, concentrate, and marijuana


product;



Req. No. 2629 Page 3


3. Seizing, destroying, confiscating, embargoing, or placing an


administrative hold on any marijuana or marijuana product not


properly logged in the inventory tracking system or untraceable


product required to be in the system, altered or improperly


packaged, or illegally held in violation of the Oklahoma Medical


Marijuana and Patient Protection Act, any other laws of this state,


or any rules promulgated by the Executive Director;


4. Assisting or aiding any law enforcement officer in the


performance of his or her duties upon such law enforcement officer’s


request or the request of other local officials having jurisdiction;


5. Referring any evidence, reports, or charges regarding


violations of any provision of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and


Patient Protection Act that carries criminal penalty, or of any


other criminal laws of this state, to the appropriate law


enforcement authority and prosecutorial authority for action;


6. Aiding the enforcement authorities of this state or any


county or municipality of the state, or the federal government, in


prosecutions of violations of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and


Patient Protection Act or any other laws of this state that carry


criminal penalty involving crimes discovered during the


investigation of violations or suspected violations of the Oklahoma


Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act or other laws


pertaining to medical marijuana or any rules promulgated pursuant


thereto;

Req. No. 2629 Page 4


7. As provided in Section 427.6 of this title, requiring any


business applicant or licensee to permit an inspection of licensed


premises during business hours or at any time of apparent operation,


marijuana equipment, and marijuana accessories, or books and


records; and to permit the testing of or examination of medical


marijuana, concentrate, or product;


8. Requiring applicants and licensees to submit complete and


current applications, information and fees required by the Oklahoma


Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act, the Oklahoma Medical


Marijuana Waste Management Act, and Sections 420 through 426.1 of


this title, and approve material changes made by the applicant or


licensee;


9. Requiring medical marijuana business licensees to submit a


sample or unit of medical marijuana or medical marijuana product to


the quality assurance laboratory when the Authority has reason to


believe the medical marijuana or medical marijuana product may be


unsafe for patient consumption or inhalation or has not been tested


in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana


and Patient Protection Act and the rules and regulations promulgated


by the Executive Director. The licensee shall provide the samples


or units of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products at its


own expense but shall not be responsible for the costs of testing;


and



Req. No. 2629 Page 5


10. Requiring medical marijuana business licensees to


periodically submit samples or units of medical marijuana or medical


marijuana products to the quality assurance laboratory for quality


assurance purposes. Licensed growers, processors, dispensaries, and


transporters shall not be required to submit samples or units of


medical marijuana or medical marijuana products more than twice a


year. The licensee shall provide the samples or units of medical


marijuana or medical marijuana products at its own expense but shall


not be responsible for the costs of testing.


G. All investigators of the Authority shall meet all training


requirements and qualifications for peace officers as required by


Section 3311 et seq. of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


H. During the course of an investigation, the Authority, as


provided by subsection F of this section, may arrest a violator or


suspected violator of any laws of this state committed in the


presence of the Authority or upon the development of probable cause


that such crime has been committed. The Authority, as provided by


subsection F of this section, may, upon request of a sheriff or


another peace officer of this state, or any political subdivision


thereof, assist in the apprehension and arrest of a violator or


suspected violator of any of the laws of this state.


I. The Executive Director may employ or contract with


attorneys, as needed, to advise the Authority on all legal matters


and to appear for and represent the Executive Director and the

Req. No. 2629 Page 6


Authority in all administrative hearings and all litigation or other


proceedings which may arise in the discharge of their duties. At


the request of the Executive Director, such attorneys shall assist


district attorneys in prosecuting charges of violators of the


Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act or any other


laws of this state that carry criminal penalty involving crimes


discovered during the investigation of violations or suspected


violations of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection


Act or other laws pertaining to medical marijuana or any rules


promulgated pursuant thereto.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2629 CAD 1/9/2026 2:48:58 PM























Req. No. 2629 Page 7